Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.130

Witness fees and mileage.

Each witness who appears before the joint committee by its order, other than a state official or employee, shall receive for his or her attendance the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers signed by such witness, verified by the legislative auditor, and approved by the chair and the vice chair of the joint committee.

[ 1996 c 288 s 21; 1951 c 43 s 10.]

NOTES:

Witness fees and mileage: Chapter 2.40 RCW.